Connecticut, session 2026, SB00331.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 17b-274f of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(b) The duration of any step therapy program requirement [shall] for
Medicaid coverage of a prescription drug may follow evidence-based
guidelines issued by the manufacturer of the prescription drug and the
federal Food and Drug Administration. If no such guidelines exist, step
therapy may not be longer than a period of thirty days, after which time
the prescribing practitioner may deem such treatment as clinically
ineffective for the patient. When the prescribing practitioner deems the
treatment to be clinically ineffective, the drug prescribed and
recommended by the practitioner shall be dispensed and covered under
the Medicaid program.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) The Department of Social
Services, or any entity under contract with the department to administer
pharmacy benefits, shall provide the following notice to a HUSKY
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 331
Health plan enrollee affected by a decision by the department to deny
or suspend payment for a prescription drug or institute new step
therapy or prior authorization requirements:
(1) For prescription payment requests submitted electronically by a
pharmacy and denied for any reason, an individualized written notice
(A) at the pharmacy at the time of the denial, or (B) through United
States mail not later than twenty-four business hours after the time of
the denial;
(2) For a planned electronic suspension or termination of payment for
a prescribed prescription drug, written notice by United States mail not
later than ten days before such suspension or termination; and
(3) In the event of new prior authorization or step therapy
requirements for a prescription drug prescribed to a HUSKY Health
plan enrollee, written notice by United States mail at the same time that
the department electronically informs prescribers of any such
requirements or sixty days before the new requirements are
implemented, whichever is earlier. Such notice shall include
information in plain language about (A) the new requirements, (B) how
to comply with such requirements, and (C) the importance of talking to
the prescriber of such prescription drug about alternative prescription
drugs that may be available.
(b) Notices sent pursuant to this section shall contain information on
any due process or appeal rights a HUSKY Health plan enrollee has
under federal and state laws and regulations, including, but not limited
to, as applicable, the provisions of 42 CFR 431.206, 42 CFR 431. 210 and
42 CFR 431.211.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 17b-274f(b)
Sec. 2 from passage New section
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 331
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Sections 2 to 4, inclusive, were consolidated into Section 2 and redrafted
for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3